Utah statutes.
72-4-103.   Deletion of highway from state highway system -- Return to county or municipality or abandonment.

When a state highway or portion of a state highway is deleted from the state highway system by the Legislature or the commission, the department shall:

(1)  return or relinquish the state highway or portion of the state highway to the county or municipality in which it is situated; or

(2)  abandon the state highway or portion of the state highway if it no longer serves the purpose of a highway.

